Utah statutes.
35A-1-204.   Division directors -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Qualifications.

(1)  The chief officer of each division within the department shall be a director, who shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the division.

(2)  A director shall be appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the governor and may be removed from that position at the will of the executive director.

(3)  A director of a division shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(4) (a)  A director of a division shall be experienced in administration and possess such additional qualifications as determined by the executive director.

(b)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the director of the Division of Adjudication shall be admitted to the practice of law in Utah.

